fi: Taustan suunnittelu: Kanvaasi; Väriavainnus; Kokoontaitettava; Muslin; Painettu; Saumaton paperi; Vinyyli; Muu
nb: Bakgrunnsdesign: Lerret; Chroma-nøkkel; Sammenleggbar; Muslin; Fortrykt; Sømløst papir; Vinyl; Annet
hr-HR: Dizajn pozadine: Platno; Chroma key; Sklopivo; Muslin; S uzorkom; Bešavni papir; Vinil; Ostalo
zh-TW: 背景設計: 帆布; 色鍵; 折疊式; Muslin 有機棉; 列印; 無縫紙; 乙烯基; 其他
pl: Projekt tła: Płótno; Tło chromatyczne; Składana; Muślin; Drukowane; Bezszwowy papier; Winyl; Inne
lt-LT: Fono dizainas: „Canvas“; „Chroma Key“; Sutraukiamas; Muslinas; Spausdintinis; Popierius be siūlių; Vinilas; Kita
ko: 배경 디자인: 캔버스; 크로마키; 접이식; 모슬린; 프린트; 배경지; 비닐; 기타
tr: Arka plan tasarımı: Tuval; Renk anahtarı; Katlanır; Muslin; Önceden basılmış; Kesintisiz kağıt; Vinil; Diğer
pt-PT: Design de fundo: Tela; Chroma key; Colapsável; Musselina; Impresso; Papel seamless; Vinil; Outro
pt-BR: Formato do plano de fundo: Tela; Chroma key; Dobrável; Muslin; Impresso; Papel fundo infinito; Vinil; Outro
sv: Bakgrundsdesign: Kanvas; Chroma key; Hopfällbar; Muslin; Tryckt; Sömlöst papper; Vinyl; Övrigt
da: Baggrundsdesign: Lærred; Chroma-nøgle; Sammenklappelig; Muslin; Trykt; Sømløst papir; Vinyl; Andet
es: Diseño de fondo: Lienzo; Chroma key; Plegable; Muselina; Impreso; Papel sin costuras; Vinilo; Otros
sk-SK: Návrh pozadia: Plátno; Farebné kľučovanie; Skladací; Mušelín; Potlačený; Bezšvový papier; Vinyl; Iné
ru: Тип фона: Холст; Хромакей; Складной; Муслин; С рисунком; Бесшовный бумажный; Винил; Другое
fr: Conception de l’arrière-plan: Toiles; Clé chromatique; Pliable; Muslin; Imprimé; Papier sans couture; Vinyl; Autre
de: Design des Hintergrunds: Leinwand; Chroma-Key; Zusammenklappbar; Musselin; Gedruckt; Nahtloses Papier; Vinyl; Sonstiges
sl-SI: Zasnova ozadja: Platno; Kromatski ključ; Zložljivo; Muslin; Tiskano; Brezšivni papir; Vinil; Drugo
cs: Návrh pozadí: Plátno; Chromatický klíč; Skládací; Mušelín; S potiskem; Bezešvý papír; Vinylové; Jiné
nl: Achtergrondontwerp: Canvas; Chromakey; Inklapbaar; Mousseline; Gedrukt; Naadloos papier; Vinyl; Andere
vi: Thiết kế hậu cảnh: Toan; Hiệu ứng Chroma Key; Có thể thu gọn; Vải muxơlin; In sẵn; Mảng liền mạch; Nhựa vinyl; Khác
zh-CN: 背景设计: 画布; 色度键; 可折叠; 薄纱; 印花; 无缝纸; 乙烯基贴纸; 其他
bg-BG: Дизайн на фона: Платно; Син екран; Сгъваем; Муселин; Отпечатан; Безшевна хартия; Винил; Други
th: การออกแบบพื้นหลัง: ผ้าใบ; โครมาคีย์; พับเก็บได้; มัสลิน; แบบพิมพ์; กระดาษฉากแบบม้วนไม่มีรอยต่อ; ไวนิล; อื่นๆ
ro-RO: Design fundal: Pânză; Chroma key; Demontabil; Muselină; Imprimat; Hârtie fără sfârșit; Vinil; Altele
it: Design dello sfondo: Tela; Chiave cromatica; Richiudibile; Mussola; Stampato; Carta seamless; Vinile; Altro
el: Σχεδιασμός φόντου: Καμβάς; Φόντο chroma key; Πτυσσόμενο; Μουσελίνα; Εκτυπωμένο; Χαρτί χωρίς ραφή; Βινύλιο; Άλλο
hu: Háttér kialakítása: Vászon; Kék háttér; Összecsukható; Muszlin; Nyomtatott; Folytonos papír; Vinil; Egyéb
en: Background design: Canvas; Chroma key; Collapsible; Muslin; Printed; Seamless paper; Vinyl; Other
ja: 背景の種類: キャンバス; クロマキー; 折りたたみ可能; モスリン; プリント; シームレスペーパー; ビニール; その他